Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-511
Nonprofit organization; conduct lottery or raffle; conditions.

Any qualifying nonprofit organization may conduct a lottery or raffle that has gross proceeds not greater than fifteen thousand dollars. Except as provided for a lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to section 9-511.02, each chance in such lottery or raffle shall have an equal likelihood of being a winning chance. The gross proceeds shall be used solely for charitable or community betterment purposes, awarding of prizes, and expenses. Any qualifying nonprofit organization may conduct one lottery per calendar month that has gross proceeds not greater than fifteen thousand dollars. Any qualifying nonprofit organization may conduct one or more raffles in a calendar month if the total gross proceeds from such raffles do not exceed fifteen thousand dollars during such month.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 169;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 30.
July 1, 2026